Washington statutes.
RCW 33.48.240

Organizing permit—Amendment, alteration, suspension, or revocation by director—Grounds.

The director may amend, alter, suspend, or revoke any permit issued under RCW 33.48.150 if there is a violation of the terms and conditions of the permit or if the director determines that the subscription or proposed issue and sale is no longer fair, just, and equitable.

[ 1994 c 92 s 489; 1982 c 3 s 106; 1973 c 130 s 14.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.

Severability—1973 c 130: See note following RCW 33.24.350.